Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-811
Division; funding; powers and duties.

The division shall coordinate the integration and management of all funds appropriated by the Legislature or otherwise received by the department from any other public or private source for the provision of behavioral health services to ensure the statewide availability of an appropriate array of community-based behavioral health services and continuum of care and the allocation of such funds to support the consumer and his or her plan of treatment.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 458.